Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6087.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 130a. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, if any of the following apply, relocation assistance must be paid to a tenant by the respective party: (a) By a landlord of a premises, if an enforcing agency does all of the following under section 130: (i) Determines that conditions exist in a premises that constitute a hazard to the health and safety of the tenant. (ii) Determines that the conditions described under subparagraph (i) were caused by the landlord's inadequate maintenance or management of the premises. (iii) Orders that the premises be vacated. (b) By an owner or agent of a building or structure, if an enforcing agency does all of the following: (i) Determines that a building or structure is a dangerous building under section 139. (ii) Determines that the conditions that made the building or structure a dangerous building were caused by the landlord's inadequate maintenance or management of the building or structure and noncompliance with any of the following: (A) This act. (B) The Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1501 to 125.1531. (C) A building code of the city, village, or township in which the building or structure is located. (iii) Orders that the building or structure be demolished. (2) All of the following apply to relocation assistance paid pursuant to subsection (1): (a) The relocation assistance must be in an amount equal to 3 times the current monthly rent paid by the tenant, as determined under the rental agreement. (b) The relocation amount must be paid to the tenant regardless of whether the tenant is current on rent or other charges or fees. (c) The relocation assistance must be paid within 7 business days after an enforcing agency issues an order under subsection (1)(a)(iii) or (b)(iii). (3) The relocation assistance paid pursuant to subsection (1) is in addition to any other remedy available under this act or otherwise available by law. (4) As used in this section, "tenant" means an individual who occupies a premises or building or structure for residential purposes with the consent of the landlord of the premises or owner or agent of the building or structure for an agreed-upon consideration.